en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Arts & Crafts > Art & Crafting Materials > Craft Paint, Ink & Glaze > Art Ink: Acrylic Ink; Alcohol Ink; Calligraphy Ink; Drawing Ink; India Ink; Sumi Ink; Watercolor Ink
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Řemesla a koníčky > Materiál pro umění a řemesla > Hobby barvy, inkousty a glazury > Umělecké inkousty: Akrylový inkoust; Alkoholový inkoust; Kaligrafický inkoust; Kreslicí inkoust; Indický inkoust; Inkoust Sumi; Akvarelový inkoust
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Artizanat > Materiale pentru artă/artizanat > Vopsea, cerneală și glazură pentru proiecte de artizanat > Cerneală pentru proiecte artistice: Cerneală acrilică; Cerneală pe bază de alcool; Cerneală pentru caligrafie; Cerneală pentru desen; Tuș; Cerneală sumi; Cerneală pentru acuarele
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 藝術品和手工藝品 > 藝術/手作材料 > 手工藝顏料、墨水和釉料 > 顏料墨水: 壓克力墨水; 酒精墨水; 書法墨水; 插畫墨水; 印度墨水; 墨汁; 水彩墨水
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > วัสดุงานศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > สี หมึก และสารเคลือบสำหรับงานฝีมือ > หมึกสำหรับงานศิลปะ: หมึกอะคริลิก; หมึกแอลกอฮอล์; หมึกเขียนพู่กัน; หมึกสำหรับวาด; หมึกอินเดีย; หมึกซูมิ; หมึกสีน้ำ
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > クラフト・アート > アート・クラフト用素材 > クラフト用絵の具・インク > アート用インク: アクリルインク; アルコールインク; カリグラフィーインク; ドローイングインク; 墨汁; 墨; 水彩インク
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Arte e artesanato > Materiais de arte e de artesanato > Tintas para caligrafia, esmaltes e tintas para artesanato > Tintas para caligrafia: Tinta acrílica; Tinta a álcool; Tinta de caligrafia; Tinta de desenho; Tinta da China; Tinta Sumi; Tinta de aquarela
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Håndarbejde og hobby > Materialer til håndarbejde og hobby > Maling, blæk og glasur til håndarbejde > Blæk til kunstarbejde: Akrylblæk; Alkoholblæk; Kalligrafiblæk; Tegneblæk; Indisk blæk; Sumi-blæk; Akvarelblæk
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Kunst og håndverk > Kunst- og håndverksmaterialer > Hobbymaling, blekk og glasur > Kunstblekk: Akrylblekk; Alkoholbasert blekk; Kalligrafiblekk; Tegneblekk; Indiablekk; Sumiblekk; Akvarellblekk
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Művészet és barkácsolás > Művészeti és kézműves anyagok > Kézműves festék, tinta és máz > Művésztinta: Akriltinta; Alkoholtinta; Kalligráfiatinta; Rajztinta; Indiai tinta; Sumi tinta; Akvarell tinta
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artes e trabalhos manuais > Materiais para artes e trabalhos manuais > Tintas, pigmentos e revestimentos para trabalhos manuais > Tinta para arte: Tinta acrílica; Tinta de álcool; Tinta de caligrafia; Tinta de desenho; Tinta da Índia; Tinta Sumi; Tinta de aguarela
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Menai ir amatai > Menų ir amatų medžiagos > Dažai, rašalas ir glazūra rankdarbiams > Meninis rašalas: Akrilinis rašalas; Alkoholio rašalas; Kaligrafijos rašalas; Braižybos rašalas; Tušas; Sumi rašalas; Akvarelinis rašalas
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Искусство и рукоделие > Материалы для художественных работ и рукоделия > Краска, тушь и глазурь > Художественная тушь: Акриловая тушь; Тушь на спиртовой основе; Тушь для каллиграфии; Чертежная тушь; Индийская тушь; Японская тушь (суми); Тушь на водной основе
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Vật liệu nghệ thuật & thủ công mỹ nghệ > Sơn, mực và đồ gốm tráng men > Mực vẽ: Màu acrylic; Màu cồn; Mực viết thư pháp; Màu vẽ; Mực tàu; Mực Sumi; Mực màu nước
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Artigianato e hobby > Materiali per hobby e artigianato > Smalto, inchiostro e vernice per attività creative > Inchiostro per attività artistiche: Inchiostro acrilico; Inchiostro alcolico; Inchiostro da scrittura; Inchiostro da disegno; Inchiostro indiano; Bastone d'inchiostro; Inchiostro acquerello
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Kunsthandwerk & Hobby > Kunst- & Bastelmaterialien > Bastelfarben, -tinten & -lacke > Tinte für Kunstarbeiten: Acryltinte; Alkoholtinte; Kalligraphie-Tinte; Zeichentinte; Tusche; Sumi-Tinte; Aquarelltinte
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Sztuka i rękodzieło > Materiały dla artystów i rękodzielników > Farby, tusze i laserunki > Tusze: Atrament akrylowy; Atrament alkoholowy; Atrament do kaligrafii; Atrament do rysowania; Tusz; Tusz sumi; Atrament akwarelowy
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Hantverk och hobbyer > Hobbymaterial > Hobbyfärg, bläck och lasyr > Bläck: Akrylbläck; Alkoholbaserat bläck; Kalligrafibläck; Ritningsbläck; India-bläck; Sumi-bläck; Akvarellbläck
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 미술/공예 > 미술/공예 재료 > 공예 페인트/잉크/유약 > 미술용 잉크: 아크릴 잉크; 알코올 잉크; 캘리그라피 잉크; 소묘용 잉크; 인디아 잉크; 수미 잉크; 수채화 잉크
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Sanatlar ve El İşleri > Sanat ve El İşleri Malzemeleri > El İşi Boyası, Mürekkebi ve Verniği > Sanat Mürekkebi: Akrilik Mürekkep; Alkol Bazlı Mürekkep; Kaligrafi Mürekkebi; Çizim Mürekkebi; Hint Mürekkebi; Sumi Mürekkebi; Suluboya Mürekkebi
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Loisirs créatifs > Matériaux pour loisirs créatifs > Peinture, encre et vernis pour loisirs créatifs > Encre artistique: Encre acrylique; Encre à alcool; Encre de calligraphie; Encre à dessin; Encre de Chine; Encre Sumi; Encre aquarelle
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Изкуства и творчество > Творчески материали > Хоби боя, мастило и глазура > Художествено мастило: Акрилно мастило; Алкохолно мастило; Мастило за калиграфия; Мастило за рисуване; Индийско мастило; Туш „Суми“; Акварелно мастило
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 手工艺品 > 手工艺材料 > 手工艺漆、墨水和釉料 > 艺术墨水: 丙烯墨水; 酒精墨水; 书法水墨; 绘画墨水; 印度墨水; 黑墨汁; 水彩墨水
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Umetnost in ročna dela > Materiali za umetniško ustvarjanje in ročna dela > Barve, črnilo in glazura za ročna dela > Črnilo za umetniško ustvarjanje: Akrilno črnilo; Alkoholno črnilo; Črnilo za kaligrafijo; Črnilo za risanje; Indijsko črnilo; Kitajsko črnilo; Akvarelno črnilo
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Manualidades > Materiales para manualidades > Pintura, tinta y esmalte > Tinta artística: Tinta acrílica; Tinta alcohólica; Tinta de caligrafía; Tinta de dibujo; Tinta china; Tinta sumi; Tinta acuarela
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Taide ja askartelu > Askartelumateriaalit > Askartelumaali, -muste ja -lakat > Taidemuste: Akryylimuste; Alkoholimuste; Kalligrafiamuste; Piirustusmuste; Tussimuste; Kiinteä tussimuste; Akvarellivärit
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Výtvarná dielňa > Materiály pre výtvarnú dielňu > Kreatívne farby, atramenty a glazúry > Atrament: Akrylový atrament; Atrament s obsahom alkoholu; Kaligrafický atrament; Atrament na kreslenie; Indický atrament; Sumi atrament; Akvarelový atrament
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Handwerk en hobby's > Handwerk- en hobbymaterialen > Hobbyverf, -inkt en -vernis > Inkt voor hobbygebruik: Acrylinkt; Alcoholinkt; Kalligrafie-inkt; Tekeninkt; Indische inkt; Sumi-inkt; Aquarelinkt
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Umjetnost i rukotvorine > Materijali za umjetnost i rukotvorine > Boje, tinte i glazure za rukotvorine > Umjetnička tinta: Akrilna tinta; Alkoholna tinta; Tinta za kaligrafiju; Tinta za crtanje; Tuš; Sumi tinta; Akvarel tuš
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες > Υλικά τέχνης & χειροτεχνίας > Χρώματα, μελάνια και γυαλίσματα για χειροτεχνίες > Καλλιτεχνικό μελάνι: Ακρυλικό μελάνι; Αλκοολούχο Μελάνι; Μελάνι καλλιγραφίας; Μελάνι σχεδίου; Μελάνι India; Μελάνι Sumi; Μελάνι υδατοχρώματος